New York, session 2025-2026, S7562.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 6810 of the education law, as 2 amended by section 2 of part V of chapter 57 of the laws of 2012, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. No drug for which a prescription is required by the provisions of 5 the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act or by the commissioner of health 6 shall be distributed or dispensed to any person except upon a 7 prescription written by a person legally authorized to issue such 8 prescription. Such drug shall be compounded or dispensed by a licensed 9 pharmacist, and no such drug shall be dispensed without affixing to the 10 immediate container in which the drug is sold or dispensed a label bear- 11 ing the name and address of the owner of the establishment in which it 12 was dispensed, the date compounded, the number of the prescription under 13 which it is recorded in the pharmacist's prescription files, the name of 14 the prescriber, the name and address of the patient, a physical 15 description of the drug including, but not limited to, the size, shape, 16 color, and imprint of the drug, and the directions for the use of the 17 drug by the patient as given upon the prescription. All labels shall 18 conform to such rules and regulations as promulgated by the commissioner 19 pursuant to section sixty-eight hundred twenty-nine of this article. The 20 prescribing and dispensing of a drug which is a controlled substance 21 shall be subject to additional requirements provided in article thirty- 22 three of the public health law. The words "drug" and "prescription 23 required drug" within the meaning of this article shall not be construed 24 to include soft or hard contact lenses, eyeglasses, or any other device EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02714-01-5 S. 7562 2 1 for the aid or correction of vision. Nothing in this subdivision shall 2 prevent a pharmacy from furnishing a drug to another pharmacy which does 3 not have such drug in stock for the purpose of filling a prescription. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.